Indiana, session 2026, SB87.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 22-5-1.7-11.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.252-2015,
2 SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
3 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.1. (a) This section applies only to a contract for
4 a public works project entered into or renewed after June 30, 2015, and
5 before July 1, 2026. A public agency may not enter into or renew a
6 contract for a public works project with a contractor unless:
7 (1) the contract contains:
8 (A) a provision requiring the contractor to enroll in and verify
9 the work eligibility status of all newly hired employees of the
10 contractor through the E-Verify program; and
11 (B) a provision that provides that a contractor is not required
12 to verify the work eligibility status of all newly hired
13 employees of the contractor through the E-Verify program if
14 the E-Verify program no longer exists; and
15 (2) the contractor signs an affidavit affirming that the contractor
16 does not knowingly employ an unauthorized alien.
17 (b) This section applies only to a contract for a public works
SB 87—LS 6372/DI 137

2
1 project under IC 4-13.6, IC 5-16, IC 5-23-4, IC 5-30, or IC 5-32
2 entered into or renewed after June 30, 2026. A public agency may
3 not enter into or renew a contract for a public works project with
4 a contractor unless:
5 (1) the contract contains:
6 (A) a provision requiring the contractor to enroll in and
7 verify the work eligibility status of all newly hired
8 employees of the contractor through the E-Verify
9 program; and
10 (B) a provision that provides that a contractor is not
11 required to verify the work eligibility status of all newly
12 hired employees of the contractor through the E-Verify
13 program if the E-Verify program no longer exists; and
14 (2) the contractor signs a notarized affidavit affirming that
15 the contractor does not knowingly employ an unauthorized
16 alien.
17 SECTION 2. IC 22-5-1.7-11.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
18 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
19 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.2. (a) This section applies only
20 to a public contract for services that is:
21 (1) entered into or renewed after June 30, 2026; and
22 (2) for a public works project under:
23 (A) IC 4-13.6;
24 (B) IC 5-16;
25 (C) IC 5-23-4;
26 (D) IC 5-30;
27 (E) IC 5-32; or
28 (F) any other statute applicable to the public works of the
29 public agency.
30 (b) A contractor for a public works project, including the
31 general contractor, a construction manager, or CMc (as defined in
32 IC 5-32-2-5), shall do the following:
33 (1) Before a contractor's employees begin work on a public
34 works project do the following:
35 (A) Provide the person who hired the contractor a
36 notarized affidavit affirming that the contractor does not
37 knowingly employ an unauthorized alien.
38 (B) Enroll in and verify the work eligibility of all
39 employees of the contractor working on the public works
40 project through the E-Verify program.
41 (2) Upon request of the person who hired the contractor,
42 provide an E-verification number for an individual who is:
SB 87—LS 6372/DI 137

3
1 (A) employed by the contractor; and
2 (B) working on the public works project;
3 within three (3) business days of the request.
4 (c) A contractor, including the general contractor, a
5 construction manager, or CMc (as defined in IC 5-32-2-5), may not
6 employ an individual for a public works project if:
7 (1) the contractor has verified the individual's work eligibility
8 through the E-verify program; and
9 (2) the individual has no E-verification number.
10 However, an individual may work on the project if the individual
11 provides the contractor with a valid E-verification number any
12 time after the initial verification.
13 (d) A contractor, including the general contractor, a
14 construction manager, or CMc (as defined in IC 5-32-2-5), acting
15 in good faith who falsely identifies:
16 (1) an unauthorized worker as an authorized worker; or
17 (2) an authorized worker as an unauthorized worker;
18 based on information received from the E-Verify system in order
19 to comply with the provisions of this section is immune from civil
20 liability with respect to the false identification.
21 SECTION 3. IC 34-30-2.1-298.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
22 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
23 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 298.5. IC 22-5-1.7-11.2
24 (Concerning a contractor that discloses false information about an
25 employee).
SB 87—LS 6372/DI 137

4
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Pensions and Labor, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 87, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, delete lines 1 through 15, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 22-5-1.7-11.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.252-2015,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.1. (a) This section applies only to a contract for
a public works project entered into or renewed after June 30, 2015, and
before July 1, 2026. A public agency may not enter into or renew a
contract for a public works project with a contractor unless:
(1) the contract contains:
(A) a provision requiring the contractor to enroll in and verify
the work eligibility status of all newly hired employees of the
contractor through the E-Verify program; and
(B) a provision that provides that a contractor is not required
to verify the work eligibility status of all newly hired
employees of the contractor through the E-Verify program if
the E-Verify program no longer exists; and
(2) the contractor signs an affidavit affirming that the contractor
does not knowingly employ an unauthorized alien.
(b) This section applies only to a contract for a public works
project under IC 4-13.6, IC 5-16, IC 5-23-4, IC 5-30, or IC 5-32
entered into or renewed after June 30, 2026. A public agency may
not enter into or renew a contract for a public works project with
a contractor unless:
(1) the contract contains:
(A) a provision requiring the contractor to enroll in and
verify the work eligibility status of all newly hired
employees of the contractor through the E-Verify
program; and
(B) a provision that provides that a contractor is not
required to verify the work eligibility status of all newly
hired employees of the contractor through the E-Verify
program if the E-Verify program no longer exists; and
(2) the contractor signs a notarized affidavit affirming that
the contractor does not knowingly employ an unauthorized
alien.".
Page 2, delete lines 12 through 29, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(b) A contractor for a public works project, including the
SB 87—LS 6372/DI 137

5
general contractor, a construction manager, or CMc (as defined in
IC 5-32-2-5), shall do the following:
(1) Before a contractor's employees begin work on a public
works project do the following:
(A) Provide the person who hired the contractor a
notarized affidavit affirming that the contractor does not
knowingly employ an unauthorized alien.
(B) Enroll in and verify the work eligibility of all
employees of the contractor working on the public works
project through the E-Verify program.
(2) Upon request of the person who hired the contractor,
provide an E-verification number for an individual who is:
(A) employed by the contractor; and
(B) working on the public works project;
within three (3) business days of the request.
(c) A contractor, including the general contractor, a
construction manager, or CMc (as defined in IC 5-32-2-5), may not
employ an individual for a public works project if:
(1) the contractor has verified the individual's work eligibility
through the E-verify program; and
(2) the individual has no E-verification number.
However, an individual may work on the project if the individual
provides the contractor with a valid E-verification number any
time after the initial verification.
(d) A contractor, including the general contractor, a
construction manager, or CMc (as defined in IC 5-32-2-5), acting
in good faith who falsely identifies:
(1) an unauthorized worker as an authorized worker; or
(2) an authorized worker as an unauthorized worker;
to comply with the provisions of this section is immune from civil
liability with respect to the false identification.
SECTION 3. IC 34-30-2.1-298.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 298.5. IC 22-5-1.7-11.2
(Concerning a contractor that discloses false information about an
employee).".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 87 as introduced.)
ROGERS, Chairperson
SB 87—LS 6372/DI 137

6
Committee Vote: Yeas 10, Nays 0.
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 87 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 3, line 18, delete "to" and insert "based on information
received from the E-Verify system in order to".
(Reference is to SB 87 as printed January 16, 2026.)
ROGERS
SB 87—LS 6372/DI 137